District of Columbia statutes.
31-5724

Repealed

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities — Approval and certificates of Commissioner required.

Repealed.

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 159, ch. 135, § 3
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(o), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86,§ 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1224.
1973 Ed., § 35-924.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.